Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 85. Mississippi Rural Impact Act

§ 57-85-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Rural Impact Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 506, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2003.).

§ 57-85-3.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and determines that:

There exists in the State of Mississippi a continuing need for gainful employment for the citizens of the rural areas of the state.

To help provide employment opportunities and to impact the quality of life in these rural areas, a division within the Mississippi Development Authority should be created with power to promote business and economic development through job producing programs and by providing financial assistance to communities and businesses.

In accomplishing this purpose, such division will be acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state in the performance of essential public functions and serving a valid purpose in improving or otherwise promoting their health, welfare and prosperity, and the enactment of the provisions hereinafter set forth is for a valid public purpose.

The borrowing of money and the issuance of bonds for the purposes hereinafter set forth serves valid public purposes that will contribute to the employment base of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 506, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2003.).

§ 57-85-5.
Definitions; Mississippi Rural Impact Fund; grants, loans and loan guaranties; application; powers.

For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

“Project” means construction, rehabilitation or repair of buildings; sewer systems and transportation directly affecting the site of the proposed rural business; sewer facilities, acquisition of real property, development of real property, improvements to real property, and any other project approved by the Mississippi Development Authority.

“Rural business” means a new or existing business located or to be located in a rural community or a business or industry located or to be located within five (5) miles of a rural community. “Rural business” does not include gaming businesses or utility businesses.

“Rural community” means a county in the State of Mississippi that meets the population criteria for the term “limited population county” as provided in Section 57-1-18. “Rural community” also means a municipality in the State of Mississippi that meets the population criteria for the term “small municipality” as provided in Section 57-1-18.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the “Mississippi Rural Impact Fund,” which shall consist of funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund shall be used to make grants and loans to rural communities and loan guaranties on behalf of rural businesses to assist in completing projects under this section.

Monies in the fund which are derived from proceeds of bonds issued after April 15, 2003, may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the MDA for the administration of the various grant, loan and financial incentive programs administered by the MDA. An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained by the MDA. Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the proceeds of bonds issued. Reimbursements under this paragraph (b) shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

The MDA may use monies in the fund to pay for the services of architects, engineers, attorneys and such other advisors, consultants and agents that the MDA determines are necessary to review loan and grant applications and to implement and administer the program established under this section.

The State Auditor may conduct performance and compliance audits under this chapter according to Section 7-7-211(o) and may bill the oversight agency.

The MDA shall establish a program to make grants and loans to rural communities and loan guaranties on behalf of rural businesses from the Mississippi Rural Impact Fund. A rural community may apply to the MDA for a grant or loan under this section in the manner provided for in this section. A rural business may apply to the MDA for a loan guaranty under this section in the manner provided in this section.

A rural community desiring assistance under this section must submit an application to the MDA. The application must include a description of the project for which assistance is requested, the cost of the project for which assistance is requested and any other information required by the MDA. A rural business desiring assistance under this section must submit an application to the MDA. The application must include a description of the purpose for which assistance is requested and any other information required by the MDA. The MDA may waive any requirements of the program established under this section in order to expedite funding for unique projects.

The MDA shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the MDA shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 506, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 427, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2019, ch. 453, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2019.